Vermont statutes. Title 24 Municipal and County Government
Chapter 85. Urban Renewal
§ 3212.
Determination of compensation; payment; proceeds from bonding.

Following the final determination of the necessity of the taking, the municipality may proceed to acquire such lands. Whenever a municipality and an owner of land or rights agree as to the amount of compensation to be paid therefor, the municipality may take possession of the land or rights and proceed with the work for which it is taken upon making the agreed payment therefor. When an owner and the municipality are unable to agree on the amount of compensation to be paid therefor, and if the municipality desires to proceed with the taking thereof, it shall appoint a time and place for hearing and give at least ten days’ notice thereof before such hearing to the persons interested, either personally or by written notice left at the residence of the owner or occupants of such lands. At such hearing it shall hear any person having an interest in such land and desiring to be heard. Within 20 days thereafter, it shall by order assess the damages sustained by such interested persons. The municipality shall file a copy of such order for record in the office of the clerk of the city, town, or village in which the land lies, and shall deliver to each interested person a copy of that portion of the order directly affecting such person and shall pay or tender 95 percent of the award to each person entitled thereto which may be accepted, retained, and disposed of to his or her own use without prejudice to such person’s right of appeal as hereafter provided. Within ten days after the expiration of the period for taking an appeal from the amount of the award, the municipality shall pay or tender the remaining five percent to each person entitled thereto who has not appealed from said award. Upon the payment or tender of 95 percent of the award as above provided, the municipality may take possession of such land and proceed with the work for which it is taken. When an appeal has been taken by any person having an interest in any property, the remaining five percent awarded on account of the taking of such property shall be retained by the municipality pending final disposition of the appeal.

When a person having an interest in the land is dissatisfied with the damages awarded therefor, the person may appeal to the Superior Court of the county wherein the land lies within 90 days of the recording of the order of the municipality. Any number of persons aggrieved may join in the appeal. Each of the appellants shall be entitled to a trial by jury.

When the award made by the municipality is upheld, the court shall tax costs against the appellant, and, after deduction of taxed costs, the municipality shall forthwith pay appellant the balance, if any, of the five percent of award withheld, and, if such five percent of award withheld is insufficient to pay such costs, appellant shall pay the municipality such amounts at such time as the court may direct. When the appellant is allowed a sum greater than was awarded by the municipality, the court shall tax costs against the municipality, the municipality shall forthwith pay appellant the five percent of award withheld, and the municipality shall pay appellant such further amounts at such time as the court may direct.

The full faith and credit of the municipality shall be pledged to the payment of all amounts awarded by such municipality or by order of the court and, if the funds of the municipality shall be insufficient to pay the amounts, the full faith, credit, and taxing power of the city, town, or village in which the applicable lands lie shall be pledged to such payment to the extent of the insufficiency. The local governing body of any city, town, or village may raise money by taxation to pay such amounts as the municipality lacks funds to pay, irrespective of any tax rate limits imposed by any general or special law. No obligation of a city, town, or village under this section shall be considered to be indebtedness for the purpose of any debt limit imposed by any general or special law.

Title to the lands taken, or rights acquired, under this section shall vest in the municipality upon the filing for record of the municipality’s order under subsection (a) of this section, unless previously acquired by deed or other appropriate instrument.

The legality of any proceedings hereunder shall not be affected as to any person by a deficiency in the notice to any other person.

If the necessity of the taking of any land for an urban renewal project is not sustained by the court, or if the taking of any such land is held to be invalid, the validity of bonds issued under subsection 3217(d) of this title shall not be affected; and the proceeds thereof may be expended for any lawful expenses of the project, and any excess proceeds may be expended for the lawful expenses of any other urban renewal project or for the payment of the principal of and interest on any outstanding general obligation of the city, town, or village issued for any purpose.

HISTORY:

1964, No. 9

(Sp. Sess.), § 3, eff. March 5, 1964; amended

1965, No. 8

;

1971, No. 185

(Adj. Sess.), § 202, eff. March 29, 1972;

1973, No. 193

(Adj. Sess.), § 3, eff. April 9, 1974;

1997, No. 161

(Adj. Sess.), § 19, eff. Jan. 1, 1998.

§ 3213.
Disposal of property in urban renewal area.

A municipality may sell, lease, or otherwise transfer real property or any interest therein acquired by it, and may enter into contracts with respect thereto, in an urban renewal area for residential, recreational, commercial, industrial, or other uses or for public use, or may retain such property or interest for public use, in accordance with the urban renewal plan, subject to such covenants, conditions, and restrictions, including covenants running with the land, as it may deem to be necessary or desirable to assist in preventing the development or spread of future slums or blighted areas or to otherwise carry out the purposes of this chapter; provided, that such sale, lease, other transfer, or retention, and any agreement relating thereto, may be made only after the approval of the urban renewal plan by vote of the municipality as provided in subsection 3207(f) of this title.
(a) (1) A municipality may sell, lease, or otherwise transfer real property or any interest therein acquired by it, and may enter into contracts with respect thereto, in an urban renewal area for residential, recreational, commercial, industrial, or other uses or for public use, or may retain such property or interest for public use, in accordance with the urban renewal plan, subject to such covenants, conditions, and restrictions, including covenants running with the land, as it may deem to be necessary or desirable to assist in preventing the development or spread of future slums or blighted areas or to otherwise carry out the purposes of this chapter; provided, that such sale, lease, other transfer, or retention, and any agreement relating thereto, may be made only after the approval of the urban renewal plan by vote of the municipality as provided in subsection 3207(f) of this title.

The purchasers or lessees and their successors and assigns shall be obligated to devote such real property only to the uses specified in the urban renewal plan, and may be obligated to comply with such other requirements as the municipality may determine to be in the public interest, including the obligation to begin within a reasonable time any improvements on such real property required by the urban renewal plan.

Such real property or interest shall be sold, leased, otherwise transferred, or retained at not less than its fair value for uses in accordance with the urban renewal plan. In determining the fair value of real property for uses in accordance with the urban renewal plan, a municipality shall take into account and give consideration to the uses provided in such plan; the restrictions upon, and the covenants, conditions, and obligations assumed by the purchaser or lessee or by the municipality retaining the property; and the objectives of such plan for the prevention of the recurrence of slum or blighted areas.

The municipality in any instrument of conveyance to a private purchaser or lessee may provide that such purchaser or lessee shall be without power to sell, lease, or otherwise transfer the real property without the prior written consent of the municipality until he or she has completed the construction of any or all improvements which he or she has obligated himself or herself to construct thereon.

Real property acquired by a municipality which, in accordance with the provisions of the urban renewal plan, is to be transferred, shall be transferred as rapidly as feasible in the public interest consistent with the carrying out of the provisions of the urban renewal plan.

Any contract for such transfer and the urban renewal plan, or such part or parts of such contract or plan as the municipality may determine, may be recorded in the land records of the municipality in such manner as to afford actual or constructive notice thereof.

A municipality may dispose of real property in an urban renewal area to private persons only under such reasonable competitive bidding procedures as it shall prescribe or as hereinafter provided in this subsection. A municipality may, by public notice by publication in a newspaper having a general circulation in the community, 30 days prior to the execution of any contract to sell, lease, or otherwise transfer real property and prior to the delivery of any instrument of conveyance with respect thereto under the provisions of this section, invite proposals from and make available all pertinent information to private redevelopers or any persons interested in undertaking to redevelop or rehabilitate an urban renewal area, or any part thereof. Such notice shall identify the area, or portion thereof, and shall state that proposals shall be made by those interested within 30 days after the date of publication of said notice, and that such further information as is available may be obtained at such office as shall be designated in said notice. The municipality shall consider all such redevelopment or rehabilitation proposals and the financial and legal ability of the persons making such proposals to carry them out, and may negotiate with any persons for proposals for the purchase, lease, or other transfer of any real property acquired by the municipality in the urban renewal area. The municipality may accept such proposal as it deems to be in the public interest and in furtherance of the purposes of this chapter; provided, that notification of intention to accept such proposal shall be filed with the governing body not less than 30 days prior to any such acceptance. Thereafter, the municipality may execute such contract in accordance with the provisions of subsection (a) of this section and deliver deeds, leases, and other instruments and take all steps necessary to effectuate such contract.

A municipality may temporarily operate and maintain real property acquired in an urban renewal area pending the disposition of the property as authorized in this chapter, without regard to the provisions of subsection (a) of this section, for such uses and purposes as may be deemed desirable even though not in conformity with the urban renewal plan.

Any real property acquired under subdivision 3209(4) of this title may be disposed of without regard to other provisions of this section if the local governing body consents to the disposal.

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this chapter, where the municipality is situated in an area designated as a redevelopment area or economic development center under the federal Area Redevelopment Act or other federal law enacted to assist in the economic development of areas suffering substantial and persistent unemployment or underemployment, land in an urban renewal project area designated under the urban renewal plan for industrial or commercial use may be disposed of to any public body or nonprofit corporation for later disposition as promptly as practicable by the public body or corporation, for redevelopment in accordance with the urban renewal plan, and only the purchaser from or lessee of the public body or corporation and their assignees shall be required to assume the obligation of beginning the building of improvements within a reasonable time. Any disposition of land to a public body or corporation under this subsection shall be made at its fair value for uses in accordance with the urban renewal plan.

Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained in this chapter, a municipality may sell, lease, or otherwise transfer real property or any interest therein acquired by it for urban renewal purposes:

To any person designated by the municipality and approved by the local governing body as a qualified eligible sponsor, if:

The municipality publishes, in at least one newspaper of general circulation in the municipality at least ten days before the sale, lease, or other disposition, a notice which includes a statement of the identity of the proposed sponsor and his or her proposed use or re-use of the urban renewal area or of the applicable portion thereof. That notice shall be in such form and manner as may be prescribed by the municipality.

The proposed sponsor agrees to pay not less than the minimum price or rental fixed by the municipality for the real property.

The proposed sponsor matches any bid higher than that minimum price or rental.

And the sale, lease, or other disposition requires effectuation of the purpose thereof within a definite and reasonable time.

If that sponsor does not agree to pay the minimum price or rental fixed by the municipality or fails to match any higher bid than that minimum price or rental, municipality may, in its sole discretion and only if consistent with the urban renewal plan, sell or lease any such real property or any interest therein to any other person bidding under provisions of subsection (b) of this section.

To any person designated by the municipality and approved by the local governing body as a qualified sponsor, without bids or other requirements of subsection (b) of this section, if:

the price or rental to be paid by the sponsor for the property and all other essential terms and conditions of the sale, lease, or other disposition are included in the notice published by the municipality under paragraph (A) of subdivision (1) of this section;

the sale, lease, or other disposition is approved by the local governing body after a public hearing held not less than ten days after publication of the notice.

Sponsors under subsection (f) of this section shall be designated by following the procedure set forth in subsection (b) of this section, except that the public notice therein required need not be made 30 days before the execution of any contract to sell, lease, or otherwise transfer real property, as set forth in subsection (b) of this section.

For the effectuation of any of the purposes of an urban renewal project and in accordance with the urban renewal plan, a municipality may grant, sell, convey, or lease, without public hearing or public letting and without following the requirements of subsection (b) of this section, to a public utility subject to the jurisdiction of the Department of Public Service, for such length of time as it may deem advisable, franchises, easements, or rights-of-way, in, over, below, along, or across any lands acquired by the municipality under this chapter, upon such terms and conditions, for such consideration, and subject to such restrictions as in the judgment of its local governing body seem proper if the local governing body first determines that the use and enjoyment for those purposes of those lands is not inconsistent with the purposes and provisions of the urban renewal plan.

HISTORY:

Amended

1966, No. 69

(Sp. Sess.),§§ 7, 8, eff. March 14, 1966.

§ 3214.
Issuance of bonds.

A municipality shall have power to issue bonds from time to time in its discretion to finance the undertaking of any urban renewal project under this chapter, including, without limiting the generality thereof, the payment of principal and interest upon any advances for surveys and plans, or preliminary loans and shall also have power to issue refunding bonds for the payment or retirement of such bonds previously issued by it. Such bonds shall be made payable, as to both principal and interest, solely from the income proceeds, revenues, and funds of the municipality derived from or held in connection with its undertaking and carrying out of urban renewal projects under this chapter; provided, however, that payment of such bonds, both as to principal and interest, may be further secured by a pledge of any loan, grant, or contribution from the federal government or other source, in aid of any urban renewal projects of the municipality under this chapter, and by a mortgage of any such urban renewal projects, or any part thereof, title to which is in the municipality.

Bonds issued under this section shall not constitute an indebtedness within the meaning of any constitutional or statutory debt limitation or restriction, and shall not be subject to the provisions of any other law or charter relating to the authorization, issuance, or sale of bonds. Bonds issued under the provisions of this chapter are declared to be issued for an essential public and governmental purpose and, together with interest thereon and income therefrom, shall be exempted from all taxes.

Bonds issued under this section shall be authorized by resolution or ordinance of the local governing body and may be payable upon demand or mature at such time or times, bear interest at such rate or rates, be in such denomination or denominations, be in such form, either coupon or registered, carry such conversion or registration privileges, have such rank or priority, be executed in such manner, be payable in such medium of payment, at such place or places, and be subject to such terms of redemption, such other characteristics, as may be provided by such resolution or trust indenture or mortgage issued pursuant thereto.

Such bonds may be sold at not less than par at public sales held after notice published prior to such sale in a newspaper having a general circulation in the area of operation and in such other medium of publication as the municipality may determine or may be exchanged for other bonds on the basis of par; provided, that such bonds may be sold to the federal government at private sale at not less than par, and, in the event less than all of the authorized principal amount of such bonds is sold to the federal government, the balance may be sold at private sale at not less than par at an interest cost to the municipality of not to exceed the interest cost to the municipality of the portion of the bonds sold to the federal government.

In case any of the public officials of the municipality whose signatures appear on any bonds or coupons issued under this chapter shall cease to be such officials before the delivery of such bonds, such signatures shall, nevertheless, be valid and sufficient for all purposes, the same as if such officials had remained in office until such delivery. Any provisions of any law to the contrary notwithstanding, any bonds issued pursuant to this chapter shall be fully negotiable.

In any suit, action, or proceeding involving the validity or enforceability of any bond issued under this chapter or the security therefore, any such bond reciting in substance that it has been issued by the municipality in connection with an urban renewal project, as herein defined, shall be conclusively deemed to have been issued for such purpose and such project shall be conclusively deemed to have been planned, located, and carried out in accordance with the provisions of this chapter.

HISTORY:

Amended

1966, No. 69

(Sp. Sess.), § 9, eff. March 14, 1966;

1969, No. 285

(Adj. Sess.), § 10, eff. April 9, 1970.

§ 3215.
Bonds as legal investments.

All banks, trust companies, bankers, savings banks and institutions, building and loan associations, savings and loan associations, investment companies, and other persons carrying on a banking or investment business; all insurance companies, insurance associations, and other persons carrying on an insurance business; and all executors, administrators, curators, trustees, and other fiduciaries, may legally invest any sinking funds, monies, or other funds belonging to them or within their control in any bonds or other obligations issued by a municipality pursuant to this chapter or by any urban renewal agency or housing authority vested with urban renewal project powers under section 3219 of this chapter; provided, that such bonds and other obligations shall be secured by an agreement between the issuer and the federal government in which the issuer agrees to borrow from the federal government and the federal government agrees to lend to the issuer, prior to the maturity of such bonds or other obligations, monies in an amount which, together with any other monies irrevocably committed to the payment of interest on such bonds or other obligations, will suffice to pay the principal of such bonds or other obligations with interest to maturity thereon, which monies under the terms of said agreement are required to be used for the purpose of paying the principal of and the interest on such bonds or other obligations at their maturity.
Such bonds and other obligations shall be authorized security for all public deposits.
It is the purpose of this section to authorize any persons, political subdivisions, and officers, public or private, to use any funds owned or controlled by them for the purchase of any such bonds or other obligations. Nothing contained in this section with regard to legal investments shall be construed as relieving any person of any duty of exercising reasonable care in selecting securities.

§ 3216.
Property exempt from taxes and from levy and sale by virtue of an execution.

All property of a municipality, including funds, owned or held by it for the purposes of this chapter shall be exempt from levy and sale by virtue of an execution, and no execution or other judicial process shall issue against the same nor shall judgment against a municipality be a charge or lien upon such property; provided, however, that the provisions of this section shall not apply to or limit the right of obligees to pursue any remedies for the enforcement of any pledge or lien given pursuant to this act by a municipality on its rents, fees, grants, or revenues from urban renewal projects.

The property of a municipality, acquired or held for the purposes of this chapter, is declared to be public property used for essential public and governmental purposes and such property shall be exempt from all taxes of the municipality, the county, the State, or any political subdivision thereof; provided, that such tax exemption shall terminate when the municipality sells, leases, or otherwise disposes of such property in an urban renewal area to a purchaser or lessee which is not a public body entitled to tax exemption with respect to such property.

§ 3217.
Cooperation by public bodies.

For the purpose of aiding in the planning, undertaking, or carrying out of an urban renewal project located within the area in which it is authorized to act, any public body may, upon such terms, with or without consideration, as it may determine:
(a) (1) For the purpose of aiding in the planning, undertaking, or carrying out of an urban renewal project located within the area in which it is authorized to act, any public body may, upon such terms, with or without consideration, as it may determine:

dedicate, sell, convey, or lease any of its interest in any property or grant easements, licenses, or other rights or privileges therein to a municipality;

incur the entire expense of any public improvements made by such public body in exercising the powers granted in this section;

do any and all things necessary to aid or cooperate in the planning or carrying out of an urban renewal plan;

lend, grant, or contribute funds to a municipality;

enter into agreements that may extend over any period, notwithstanding any provisions or rule of law to the contrary, with a municipality or other public body respecting action to be taken pursuant to any of the powers granted by this chapter, including the furnishing of funds or other assistance in connection with an urban renewal project; and

cause public buildings and public facilities, including parks, playgrounds, recreational, community, educational, water, sewer or drainage facilities, or any other works that it is otherwise empowered to undertake to be furnished; furnish, dedicate, close, vacate, pave, install, grade, regrade, plan or replan streets, roads, sidewalks, ways, or other places; plan, replan, zone, or rezone any part of the public body or make exceptions from building regulations; and cause administrative and other services to be furnished to the municipality.

If at any time title to or possession of any urban renewal project is held by any public body or governmental agency, other than the municipality, that is authorized by law to engage in the undertaking, carrying out, or administration of urban renewal projects, including any agency or instrumentality of the United States of America, the provisions of the agreements referred to in this section shall inure to the benefit of and may be enforced by such public body or governmental agency.

As used in this subsection, the term “municipality” shall also include an urban renewal agency or a housing authority vested with all of the urban renewal project powers pursuant to the provisions of section 3219 of this title.

Any sale, conveyance, lease, or agreement provided for in this section may be made by a public body without appraisal, public notice, advertisement, or public bidding.

For the purpose of aiding in the planning, undertaking, or carrying out of an urban renewal project of an urban renewal agency or a housing authority hereunder, a municipality may, in addition to its other powers and upon such terms, with or without consideration, as it may determine, do and perform any or all of the actions or things which, by the provisions of subsection (a) of this section, a public body is authorized to do or perform, including the furnishing of financial and other assistance.

For the purposes of this section, or for the purpose of aiding in the planning, undertaking, or carrying out of an urban renewal project of a municipality, that municipality may, in addition to any authority to issue bonds pursuant to section 3214 of this title, issue and sell its general obligation bonds.
(d) (1) For the purposes of this section, or for the purpose of aiding in the planning, undertaking, or carrying out of an urban renewal project of a municipality, that municipality may, in addition to any authority to issue bonds pursuant to section 3214 of this title, issue and sell its general obligation bonds.

Any bonds issued by a municipality pursuant to this section shall be issued in the manner and within the limitations prescribed by the laws of this state for the issuance and authorization of bonds by that municipality for public purposes generally. However, bonds so issued:

shall not be considered as indebtedness of the municipality limited by the provisions of section 1762 of this title or any other general or special law; and

may be authorized by a majority of all the voters present and voting on the question at a meeting of such municipality held for the purpose pursuant to subchapter 1 of chapter 53 of this title or pursuant to the provisions of any special law that governs the authorization of indebtedness by the municipality.

So long as any such bonds of the municipality are outstanding the local governing body may deduct, in any one or more years from any net increase in the aggregate taxable valuation of land and improvements in all areas covered by urban renewal plans the amount necessary to produce tax revenues equal to the current debt service on such bonds, assuming the previous year’s total tax rate and full collection.
(3) (A) So long as any such bonds of the municipality are outstanding the local governing body may deduct, in any one or more years from any net increase in the aggregate taxable valuation of land and improvements in all areas covered by urban renewal plans the amount necessary to produce tax revenues equal to the current debt service on such bonds, assuming the previous year’s total tax rate and full collection.

Only the balance, if any, of such net increase shall be taken into account in computing the sums that may be appropriated for other purposes under applicable tax rate limits.

All the taxable property in all areas covered by urban renewal plans, including the whole of such net increase, shall be subject to the same total tax rate as other taxable property, except as may be otherwise provided by law.

The net increase shall be computed each year by subtracting, from the current aggregate valuation of the land and improvements in all the areas covered by urban renewal plans, the sum of the aggregate valuations of land and improvements in each such area on the date the urban plan for such area was approved under subsection 3207(f) of this title. An area shall be deemed to be covered by an urban renewal plan until the date shown in the plan as its expiration date or until the date all the indebtedness incurred by the municipality to finance the applicable project has been paid, whichever date is later.

All the provisions of this subsection shall apply to all municipalities, notwithstanding any provision of general or special law to the contrary that specifies a different debt limit, that requires a greater vote to authorize bonds, that prescribes a different computation of appropriations under tax rate limits, or that is otherwise inconsistent with this subsection.

HISTORY:

Amended

1963, No. 2

, § 1, eff. Feb. 14, 1963;

2017, No. 74

, § 108.

§ 3218.
Title of purchaser.

Any instrument executed by a municipality and purporting to convey any right, title, or interest in any property under this chapter shall be conclusively presumed to have been executed in compliance with the provisions of this chapter insofar as title or other interest of any bona fide purchasers, lessees, or transferees of such property is concerned.

§ 3219.
Exercise of powers in carrying out urban renewal project.

A municipality may itself exercise its urban renewal project powers, as herein defined, or may, if the local governing body by resolution determines such action to be in the public interest, elect to have such powers exercised by the urban renewal agency created by section 3220 of this title or by the housing authority, if one exists or is subsequently established in the community. In the event the local governing body makes such determination, the urban renewal agency or the housing authority, as the case may be, shall be vested with all of the urban renewal project powers in the same manner as though all such powers were conferred on such agency or authority instead of the municipality. If the local governing body does not elect to make such determination, the municipality in its discretion may exercise its urban renewal project powers through a board or commissioner or through such officers of the municipality as the local governing body may by resolution determine.

As used in this section, the term “urban renewal project powers” shall include the rights, powers, functions, and duties of a municipality under this chapter, except the following: the power to determine an area to be a slum or blighted area or combination thereof and to designate such area as appropriate for an urban renewal project and to hold any public hearing required with respect thereto; the power to approve urban renewal plans and modifications thereof; the power to approve general neighborhood renewal plans and community-wide plans or programs for urban renewal; the power to acquire, demolish, remove, or dispose of property as provided in subdivision 3209(4)(A); the power to establish as general plan for the locality as a whole; the power to formulate a workable program under section 3205 of this title; the power to make the determinations and findings provided for in sections 3204, 3206, and 3207(d) of this title; the power to issue general obligation bonds under subsection 3217(d); the power to assume the responsibility to bear loss as provided in subdivision 3209(4); and the power to appropriate funds, to levy taxes and assessments, and to exercise other powers provided for in subdivision 3209(9) of this title.

HISTORY:

Amended

1966, No. 69

(Sp. Sess.), § 10, eff. March 14, 1966.

§ 3220.
Urban renewal agency.

There is hereby created in each municipality a public body corporate and politic to be known as the “urban renewal agency” of the municipality; provided, that such agency shall not transact any business or exercise its powers hereunder until or unless the local governing body has made the finding prescribed in section 3206 of this title and has elected to have the urban renewal project powers exercised by an urban renewal agency as provided in section 3219 of this title.

If the urban renewal agency is authorized to transact business and exercise powers hereunder, the mayor, by and with the advice and consent of the local governing body, shall appoint a board of commissioners of the urban renewal agency which shall consist of five commissioners. The term of office of each such commissioner shall be one year.

A commissioner shall receive no compensation for his or her services but shall be entitled to the necessary expenses, including traveling expenses, incurred in the discharge of his or her duties. Each commissioner shall hold office until his or her successor has been appointed and has qualified. A certificate of the appointment or reappointment of any commissioner shall be filed with the clerk of the municipality and such certificate shall be conclusive evidence of the due and proper appointment of such commissioner.
(c) (1) A commissioner shall receive no compensation for his or her services but shall be entitled to the necessary expenses, including traveling expenses, incurred in the discharge of his or her duties. Each commissioner shall hold office until his or her successor has been appointed and has qualified. A certificate of the appointment or reappointment of any commissioner shall be filed with the clerk of the municipality and such certificate shall be conclusive evidence of the due and proper appointment of such commissioner.

The powers of an urban renewal agency shall be exercised by the commissioners thereof. A majority of the commissioners shall constitute a quorum for the purpose of conducting business and exercising the powers of the agency and for all other purposes. Action may be taken by the agency upon a vote of a majority of the commissioners present, unless in any case the bylaws shall require a larger number. Any persons may be appointed as commissioners if they reside within the area of operation of the agency, which shall be coterminous with the area of operation of the municipality, and are otherwise eligible for such appointments under this chapter.

The mayor shall designate a chair and vice chair from among the commissioners. An agency may employ an executive director, technical experts, and such other agents and employees, permanent and temporary, as it may require, and determine their qualifications, duties, and compensation. For such legal service as it may require, an agency may employ or retain its own counsel and legal staff. An agency authorized to transact business and exercise powers under this chapter shall file, with the local governing body, on or before March 31 of each year a report of its activities for the preceding calendar year, which report shall include a complete financial statement setting forth its assets, liabilities, income, and operating expense as of the end of such calendar year. At the time of filing the report, the agency shall publish in a newspaper of general circulation in the community a notice to the effect that such report has been filed with the municipality and that the report is available for inspection during business hours in the office of the clerk and in the office of the agency.

For inefficiency or neglect of duty or misconduct in office, a commissioner may be removed only after a hearing and after he or she shall have been given a copy of the charges at least 10 days prior to such hearing and have had an opportunity to be heard in person or by counsel.

§ 3221.
Interested public officials, commissioners, or employees.

No public official or employee of a municipality, or board or commission thereof, and no commissioner or employee of a housing authority or urban renewal agency which has been vested by a municipality with urban renewal project powers under section 3219 of this title shall voluntarily acquire any personal interest, direct or indirect, in any urban renewal project, or in any property included or planned to be included in any urban renewal project of such municipality or in any contract or proposed contract in connection with such urban renewal project.
Where such acquisition is not voluntary, the interest acquired shall be immediately disclosed in writing to the local governing body and such disclosure shall be entered upon the minutes of the governing body.
If any such official, commissioner, or employee presently owns or controls, or owned or controlled within the preceding two years, any interest, direct or indirect, in any property which he or she knows is included or planned to be included in an urban renewal project, he or she shall immediately disclose this fact in writing to the local governing body, and such disclosure shall be entered upon the minutes of the governing body, and any such official, commissioner, or employee shall not participate in any action by the municipality, or board or commission thereof, housing authority, or urban renewal agency affecting such property. Any disclosure required to be made by this section to the local governing body shall concurrently be made to a housing authority or urban renewal agency which has been vested with urban renewal project powers by the municipality pursuant to the provisions of section 3219 of this title.
No commissioner or other officer of any housing authority, urban renewal agency, board, or commission exercising powers pursuant to this chapter shall hold any other public office under the municipality other than his or her commissionership or office with respect to such housing authority, urban renewal agency, board, or commission.
Any violation of the provisions of this section shall constitute misconduct in office.